Utah statutes.
53A-8a-201.    Career employee status for provisional employees -- Career status in the event of change of position -- Continuation of probationary status when position changes -- Temporary status for extra duty assignments -- Employees not eligible for career status.

(1) (a)  A provisional employee must work for a school district on at least a half-time basis for three consecutive years to obtain career employee status.

(b)  A school district may extend the provisional status of an employee up to an additional two consecutive years in accordance with a written policy adopted by the district's school board that specifies the circumstances under which an employee's provisional status may be extended.

(2)  Policies of an employing school district shall determine the status of a career employee in the event of the following:

(a)  the employee accepts a position which is substantially different from the position in which career status was achieved; or

(b)  the employee accepts employment in another school district.

(3)  If an employee who is under an order of probation or remediation in one assignment in a school district is transferred or given a new assignment in the district, the order shall stand until its provisions are satisfied.

(4)  An employee who is given extra duty assignments in addition to a primary assignment, such as a teacher who also serves as a coach or activity advisor, is a temporary employee in those extra duty assignments and may not acquire career status beyond the primary assignment.

(5)  A person is an at-will employee and is not eligible for career employee status if the person:

(a)  is a teacher who holds a competency-based license pursuant to Section 53A-6-104.5 and does not hold a level 1, 2, or 3 license as defined in Section 53A-6-103; or

(b)  holds an administrative/supervisory letter of authorization pursuant to Section 53A-6-110.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 425, 2012 General Session

